District of Columbia statutes.
39-307

Dissolution.

Except as otherwise provided in a contract or legacy transferring or loaning property to the Museum, upon dissolution of the Museum as a corporation, all remaining assets shall be transferred to the Mayor of the District of Columbia. The Mayor shall make every effort to use the assets for the Museum and public education purposes as provided in this chapter.

History

July 26, 1980, D.C. Law 3-79, § 8, 27 DCR 2546

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-2107.